src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Proper nouns inflect in practice like regular nouns

! nominatives
! !LEXICON PROPN_BACK_SGNOM_CLIT
! !+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:0   PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

! !LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_SGNOM_CLIT
! !+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:0   PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT
+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:%>t     PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT
+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:%>t     PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

! basic cases
LEXICON PROPN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS
0    PROPN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>n     PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Abe:%>tta   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Abl:%>lta   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ade:%>lla   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+All:%>lle   PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ela:%>sta   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ine:%>ssa   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>kse   PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_CLIT_OBL       ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
0    PROPN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>n     PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Abe:%>ttä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Abl:%>ltä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ade:%>llä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+All:%>lle   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ela:%>stä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ine:%>ssä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>kse   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_CLIT_OBL       ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS
+N+Prop+Sg+Ess:%>na PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:0  PROPN_BACK_POSS   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:0  PROPN_BACK_POSS   ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:0  PROPN_BACK_POSS   ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
+N+Prop+Sg+Ess:%>nä PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:0  PROPN_FRONT_POSS   ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:0  PROPN_FRONT_POSS   ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Nom:0  PROPN_FRONT_POSS   ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS
+N+Prop+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Cmt:%>i%>ne        PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS
+N+Prop+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;
+N+Prop+Cmt:%>i%>ne        PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;


! allomorphs
LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A
+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>a      PROPN_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä
+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>ä      PROPN_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN
+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>a      PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN
0+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>ä     PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA
+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>ta     PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ
+N+Prop+Sg+Par:%>tä     PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>han    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>ha     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hen    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>he     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hen    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>he     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hin    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hi     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hin    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hi     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hon    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>ho     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hun    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hu     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hyn    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hy     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hän    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hä     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hön    #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>hö     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>i%>a    PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>i%>ä    PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin   #    ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi    PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin   #    ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi    PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>n    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>n    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin  #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>sii   PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin  #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%>i%>sii   PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>i%>ta   PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>i%>tä   PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten     #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten     #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>j%>a     PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ
+N+Prop+Pl+Par:%>j%>ä     PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT      ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>seen      #     ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>see       PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>seen      #     ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>see       PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>te     PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>ten    #     ;
+N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%>te     PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>an     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>a      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>en     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>e      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>en     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>e      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>in     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>i      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>in     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>i      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>on     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>o      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>un     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>u      PROPN_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>yn     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>y      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>än     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>ä      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>ön     #         ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%>ö      PROPN_FRONT_POSS     ;

! possessives
LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN
+PxSg3:%>an    PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN
+PxSg3:%>än    PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hankaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hanko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hanpa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kohan #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kokaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kokin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kopa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kos    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pahan #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pakaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pakin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pako   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pas    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhan  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaanhan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaankin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaanko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaanpa    #        ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hänkään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hänkö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hänpä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>köhän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kökään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kökin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>köpä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kös    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pähän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>päkään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>päkin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>päkö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>päs    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinkö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>käänhän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>käänkin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>käänkö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>käänpä    #        ;


! shorthands

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   PROPN_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   PROPN_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_SINGULARS
0    PROPN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    PROPN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_SINGULARS
0    PROPN_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    PROPN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

! !LEXICON PROPN_BACK_CASES
! !0   PROPN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
! !0   PROPN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
! !
! !LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_CASES
! !0   PROPN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
! !0   PROPN_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT
0    PROPN_BACK_POSS   ;
0    PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    PROPN_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN_CLIT_OPT
0    PROPN_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    PROPN_FRONT_POSS_AN  ;
0    PROPN_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_CLIT_OPT
0    PROPN_BACK_POSS   ;
0    PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    PROPN_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;
